Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1467
Warrantor; acts prohibited.

A warrantor shall not:

(1) Fail to perform any of its warranty obligations;

(2) Fail to include, in any written notice of a factory campaign that is provided to any recreational vehicle owner or dealer, the expected date when necessary parts and equipment, including tires, chassis, and chassis parts, will be available to dealers to perform factory campaign work;

(3) Fail to compensate a dealer for authorized consumer care that was completed by the dealer relating to merchandise that was damaged:

(a) During the manufacturing process; or

(b) During transit to the dealer, if the carrier that provided transit was designated by the warrantor, factory branch, distributor, or distributor branch;

(4) Fail to compensate a dealer for authorized warranty service in accordance with the time allowances set forth in the schedule of compensation, if such warranty service was performed in a timely and competent manner;

(5) Intentionally misrepresent in any way to any purchaser of a recreational vehicle that any warranty with respect to the manufacture, performance, or design of the recreational vehicle is made by the dealer as a warrantor or co-warrantor; or

(6) Require the dealer to make any warranty to any customer in any manner related to the manufacture of a recreational vehicle.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 26.
October 1, 2026